Arkansas, session 2025, SB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-73-115 is amended to read as follows:
26-73-115. Sales and use tax reports.
(a) Upon a request made in accordance with this section, the
Department of Finance and Administration shall provide a report listing all
businesses remitting sales and use taxes for the requesting governmental
entity:
(1) For which the requestor serves as the chief executive
officer, if the request is made under subdivision (b)(1) of this section; or
(2) Identified by the requestor, if the request is made under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(b) In order to obtain a report from the department, no more than
quarterly, the chief executive officer of a county, city, or town the
*JLL050*
11/22/2024 1:00:22 PM JLL050

SB7
following may request a report from the department on the information noted
in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) The chief executive officer of a county, city, or town; or
(2) A member of the General Assembly.
(c) The department shall provide the requested information within
thirty (30) calendar days of the request.






























11/22/2024 1:00:22 PM JLL050